Hawaii statutes.
§702-205 Elements of an offense. The
elements of an offense are such (1) conduct, (2) attendant circumstances, and
(3) results of conduct, as:

(a) Are specified by the definition of the offense,
and

(b) Negative a defense (other than a defense based on
the statute of limitations, lack of venue, or lack of jurisdiction). [L 1972, c
9, pt of §1]

COMMENTARY ON §702-205

As explained in the commentary to §702-204, a clear analysis
requires that the various distinct ingredients of an offense be separately
recognized. The ingredients, denominated "elements" in §702-205, are
the conduct, the circumstances attendant to conduct, and the results of
conduct, which are specified in the definition of an offense and which negative
a defense on the merits.

The effect of including within the definition of "element"
facts (conduct, attendant circumstances, results) which negative a defense on
the merits (a defense other than one based on the statute of limitations, lack
of venue, or lack of jurisdiction) is to postulate an equivalence of the state
of mind required to establish a particular offense regardless of the diverse
circumstances giving rise to the charge. Thus, if the crime of murder requires
that the defendant act intentionally or knowingly with respect to each element,
one who intentionally kills another, recklessly mistaken that the other's
conduct threatens one's life, would not be guilty of murder, although one might
be guilty of a crime requiring only recklessness. Since the defendant must act
intentionally or knowingly with respect to attendant circumstances which
negative the defense of self-defense, conviction for murder would fail unless
it could be proven that defendant knew or believed that the defendant's
assailant's conduct did not in fact threaten serious bodily harm or death.

Prior Hawaii law did not deal directly with the problem of
defining "element" of an offense; however, the question has been
treated tangentially in cases involving sufficient corroboration of
extrajudicial confessions. A footnote in one case has provided the following
comment and definition:

Proof of the commission of a crime
consists of three elements, each of which must be proved beyond a reasonable
doubt: (1) the basic injury, such as the death in murder, the burning in
arson, or the missing property in theft, (2) the fact that the basic injury was
the result of a criminal, rather than a natural or accidental cause, and (3)
the identification of the defendant as the perpetrator of the crime. The first
two of these elements constitute the corpus delicti or body of the crime, which
is proved when the prosecution has shown that a crime has been committed by
someone.[1]

However, the same opinion, which involved a charge of burglary,
also referred to that requirement, under the prior law, that the entry be
accompanied by an intent to commit a felony, as an "essential element".[2]

The Code seeks to eliminate the somewhat inconsistent use of
the word "element" and to provide a less abstract and more meaningful
definition.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §702-205

The legislature enacted §702-205 of the Proposed Draft of the
Code without change; however, in chapter 703, dealing with defenses of
justification, the legislature departed from the Proposed Draft and required an
objective assessment of the defendant's state of mind, or a "reasonable
belief" on the defendant's part, respecting the attendant circumstances
which justify conduct otherwise deemed unlawful. Therefore, the example set
forth in the second paragraph of the above commentary is no longer applicable.

Law Journals and Reviews

Agonizing Over Aganon: A New Approach to Drafting Jury
Instructions in Criminal Cases. 10 HBJ, no. 13, at 73 (2007).

Case Notes

Section not inconsistent with entrapment provisions of
§701-115. 58 H. 479, 572 P.2d 159 (1977).

Pursuant to the definition of "element" set forth
in this section, the prior conviction reference in §709-906(7) constitutes an
element of the offense of the felony abuse charge. 116 H. 3, 169 P.3d 955
(2007).

Mentioned: 75 H. 152, 857 P.2d 579 (1993).

__________

§702-205 Commentary:

1. State v. Hale, 45 Haw. 269, 277n, 367 P.2d 81, 86n (1961).

2. Id.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next